tex/hyph-es.tex
rmano1á2 rmano1é2 rmano1í2 rmano1ó2 rmano1ú2
retro1h
retro1a2 retro1e2 retro1i2 retro1o2 retro1u2
retro1á2 retro1é2 retro1í2 retro1ó2 retro1ú2
romo1h
romo1a2 romo1e2 romo1i2 romo1o2 romo1u2
romo1á2 romo1é2 romo1í2 romo1ó2 romo1ú2
salva1h
salva1a2 salva1e2 salva1i2 salva1o2 salva1u2
salva1á2 salva1é2 salva1í2 salva1ó2 salva1ú2
seleno1h
seleno1a2 seleno1e2 seleno1i2 seleno1o2 seleno1u2
seleno1á2 seleno1é2 seleno1í2 seleno1ó2 seleno1ú2
semi1h
semi1a2 semi1e2 semi1i2 semi1o2 semi1u2
semi1á2 semi1é2 semi1í2 semi1ó2 semi1ú2
i2a.
i2as.
2ótic
emi2o2
servo1h
servo1a2 servo1e2 servo1i2 servo1o2 servo1u2
servo1á2 servo1é2 servo1í2 servo1ó2 servo1ú2
2seudo1h
2seudo1a2 2seudo1e2 2seudo1i2 2seudo1o2 2seudo1u2
2seudo1á2 2seudo1é2 2seudo1í2 2seudo1ó2 2seudo1ú2
o2os.
.so3a4s
sobre1h
sobre1a2 sobre1e2 sobre1i2 sobre1o2 sobre1u2
sobre1á2 sobre1é2 sobre1í2 sobre1ó2 sobre1ú2
sobre3a4sa
sobre3a4sas
socio1h
socio1a2 socio1e2 socio1i2 socio1o2 socio1u2
socio1á2 socio1é2 socio1í2 socio1ó2 socio1ú2
4a3rio.
4a3rios.
4a3ria.
4a3rias.
3logía
4ón.
4ones.
4i4er.
4o2ico.
4o2icos.
4o2ica.
4o2icas.
.su2b1h
.su2b2a2 .su2b2e2 .su2b2i2 .su2b2o2 .su2b2u2
.su2b2á2 .su2b2é2 .su2b2í2 .su2b2ó2 .su2b2ú2
.sub3acuát
.subi3ll
.su3bi3da
.su3bi3dor
.su3bi3do
.su3bi3dón
.su3basta
.su3básta
.su3bastá
.su3baste
.su3básté
.su3basto
.su3bástó
.sub3índ
.sub3ími
.su4b3ray
.sub3acepc
.sub3acet
.sub3aflue
.sub3alcai
.sub3arr
.sub3ártic
.sub3atómic
.sub3ejecut
.sub3elemen
.sub3emple
.sub3enten
.seb3entrad
.sub3espec
.sub3estac
.sub3estim
.sub3estím
.sub3estruc
.sub3occipit
.sub3ofici
.su3bordin
.su3bordín
.sub3urba
.sub3aliment
.su3balter
.sub3insp
.sub3intenden
.su3bir
.su3bír
.su3bién
.su3bi3mien
.su3bier
.su3bies
.su2r1est
.su2r1oes
supe2r3r
supe2r1h
supe2r1a2 supe2r1e2 supe2r1i2 supe2r1o2 supe2r1u2
supe2r1á2 supe2r1é2 supe2r1í2 supe2r1ó2 supe2r1ú2
ra5ra
ra5rá
ra5re
ra5ré
ra5rí
ra5ro
supe3r4a4r
supe3r4á4r
supe3r4á3vit.
supe3r4á3vits.
super4ior
4a3ción.
4a3ciones.
4e3rior.
4e3riores.
4e3riora.
4e3rioras.
4e3riormente.
4e3rioridad.
4e3rioridades.
4e3r4a3ble.
4e3r4a3bles.
4e3r4a3blemente.
pe5r4ante
perpon5d6r
supra1h
supra1a2 supra1e2 supra1i2 supra1o2 supra1u2
supra1á2 supra1é2 supra1í2 supra1ó2 supra1ú2
sup6ra
talmo1h
talmo1a2 talmo1e2 talmo1i2 talmo1o2 talmo1u2
talmo1á2 talmo1é2 talmo1í2 talmo1ó2 talmo1ú2
tele1h
tele1a2 tele1e2 tele1i2 tele1o2 tele1u2
tele1á2 tele1é2 tele1í2 tele1ó2 tele1ú2
4ósteo.
4ósteos.
tecno1h
tecno1a2 tecno1e2 tecno1i2 tecno1o2 tecno1u2
tecno1á2 tecno1é2 tecno1í2 tecno1ó2 tecno1ú2
.tele1imp
.tele1obj
.tele4o3lót
tera1h
tera1a2 tera1e2 tera1i2 tera1o2 tera1u2
tera1á2 tera1é2 tera1í2 tera1ó2 tera1ú2
termo1h
termo1a2 termo1e2 termo1i2 termo1o2 termo1u2
termo1á2 termo1é2 termo1í2 termo1ó2 termo1ú2
tetra1h
tetra1a2 tetra1e2 tetra1i2 tetra1o2 tetra1u2
tetra1á2 tetra1é2 tetra1í2 tetra1ó2 tetra1ú2
topo1h
topo1a2 topo1e2 topo1i2 topo1o2 topo1u2
topo1á2 topo1é2 topo1í2 topo1ó2 topo1ú2
.tra2s1h
.tra2sa2 .tra2se2 .tra2si2 .tra2so2 .tra2su2
.tra2sá2 .tra2sé2 .tra2sí2 .tra2só2 .tra2sú2
tras1abuel
tras1alcob
tras1alp
tras1altar
tras1andin
tras1atlánt
tras1oceán
tra3se3ro.
tra3se3ros.
tra3se3ra.
tra3se3ras.
.tra3su3da
.tra3su3dá
.tra3su3de
.tra3su3dé
.tra3su3do
.tra3su3dó
.tra3sunta
.tra3suntá
.tra3sunte
.tra3sunté
.tra3sunto
.tra3suntó
.tra3so3ñ
.tra3se3g
.tra3sieg
tran2s1h
tran2sa2 tran2se2 tran2si2 tran2so2 tran2su2
tran2sá2 tran2sé2 tran2sí2 tran2só2 tran2sú2
trans3aminas
tran2s1and
tran2s1atl
tran2s1oce
tran2s1ur
tran3sacci
tran3sactiv
tran3seún
tran3se3xu
tran3si3berian
tran3si3cion
tran3si3ción
tran3sido.
tran3sidos.
tran3sida.
tran3sidas.
tran3si3gi
tran3si3gí
tran3si3ge
tran3si3ja
tran3si3já
tran3si3jo
tran3silvan
tran3sisto
tran3si3ta
tran3si3tá
tran3si3te
tran3si3té
tran3si3to
tran3si3tó
tran3si3tiv
tran3si3tori
trans3oraci
tran3subst
tran3sust
.tri1ó2x
tropo1h
tropo1a2 tropo1e2 tropo1i2 tropo1o2 tropo1u2
tropo1á2 tropo1é2 tropo1í2 tropo1ó2 tropo1ú2
turbo1h
turbo1a2 turbo1e2 turbo1i2 turbo1o2 turbo1u2
turbo1á2 turbo1é2 turbo1í2 turbo1ó2 turbo1ú2
ultra1h
ultra1a2 ultra1e2 ultra1i2 ultra1o2 ultra1u2
ultra1á2 ultra1é2 ultra1í2 ultra1ó2 ultra1ú2
vice1h
vice1a2 vice1e2 vice1i2 vice1o2 vice1u2
vice1á2 vice1é2 vice1í2 vice1ó2 vice1ú2
video1h
video1a2 video1e2 video1i2 video1o2 video1u2
video1á2 video1é2 video1í2 video1ó2 video1ú2
xeno1h
xeno1a2 xeno1e2 xeno1i2 xeno1o2 xeno1u2
xeno1á2 xeno1é2 xeno1í2 xeno1ó2 xeno1ú2
xero1h
xero1a2 xero1e2 xero1i2 xero1o2 xero1u2
xero1á2 xero1é2 xero1í2 xero1ó2 xero1ú2
xilo1h
xilo1a2 xilo1e2 xilo1i2 xilo1o2 xilo1u2
xilo1á2 xilo1é2 xilo1í2 xilo1ó2 xilo1ú2
zoo1h
zoo1a2 zoo1e2 zoo1i2 zoo1o2 zoo1u2
zoo1á2 zoo1é2 zoo1í2 zoo1ó2 zoo1ú2
wa3s4h
3grafo.
3grafa.
3grafos.
3grafas.
3grafía.
3grafías.
o4i3dea.
o4i3deas.
o4i3dal.
o4i3dales.
4o2i3de.
4o2i3des.
4i2dal.
4i2dales.
4i3deo.
4i3deos.
i2o.
i2os.
2i3co.
2i3cos.
2i3ca.
2i3cas.
4e3dro.
4e3dros.
4é3drico.
4é3dricos.
4é3drica.
4é3dricas.
4í3ble.
4í3bles.
3hablante
3habiente
5humano
5humana
3a4ficionad
3a4merican
su2d3a4merican
su2r3a4merican
3e4lectr
3e4léctr
di4e5lec
di4e5léc
5i4ndustr
5islámi
5islami
5ingenier
5técnic
5biología
5céntrico
5e4cuatorial
7u4niversid
5u4niversit
}
